Missouri, session 2026, HB1699.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 192.260 and 205.100, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 192.260 and 205.100, to read as follows:
192.260. The county commissions of the several counties of this state may appoint a
duly licensed qualified physician as a county health officer for a term of one year, and in the
event a vacancy is created in the office of the county health officer, such commission may
appoint a duly licensed qualified physician for the unexpired term. If the incumbent county
health officer shall not be reappointed, the county health officer shall vacate the office,
and the county commission shall appoint an interim county health officer until the
vacancy is filled. If the county commission of any county decides to appoint a county health
officer as empowered in this law, it shall agree with the officer as to the compensation and
expenses to be paid for such service, which amount shall be paid out of the county treasury of
the county. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to require the county commission of
any county to appoint a county health officer in any county.
205.100. The county commission or commissions shall annually at their February
meeting, appoint the director of the public health center as county health officer [and such].
In the event a vacancy is created in the office of the county health officer or the
incumbent county health officer is not be reappointed, the county health officer shall
vacate the office, and the county commission shall appoint an interim county health
officer until the vacancy is filled. The county health officer shall exercise all of the rights
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1699 2
and perform all of the duties pertaining to that office as set forward under the health laws of
the state and rules and regulations of the department of health and senior services.
✔